Utah statutes.
11-13-210.   Controversies involving agreements between Utah public agencies and out-of-state agencies.

(1)  In any case or controversy involving the performance or interpretation of or the liability under an agreement entered into under this chapter between or among one or more Utah public agencies and one or more out-of-state public agencies, the public agencies that are parties to the agreement shall be real parties in interest and the state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or liabilities which it may incur by reason of being joined as a party to the case or controversy.

(2)  An action shall be maintainable against any public agency whose default, failure to perform, or other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or liability by the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

